Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-28,103
Violation; penalty.

Any person who does or commits any of the acts or things prohibited by the Pharmacy Practice Act or otherwise violates any of the provisions thereof shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor except as otherwise specifically provided.

Laws 1961, c. 339, § 16, p. 1070;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 145;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 53;

Laws 1994, LB 900, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 38;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.13;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 993.